Colorado statutes. TITLE 5 Consumer Credit Code
PART 2
UNIFORM DEBT-MANAGEMENT SERVICES ACT

5-19-201. Short title.

The short title of this part 2 is the "Uniform Debt-Management Services Act".

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1137, § 4, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.5-201 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-19-202. Definitions.

As used in this part 2, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Administrator" means the assistant attorney general designated by the attorney general pursuant to section 5-6-103.

"Affiliate":

With respect to an individual, means:

The spouse of the individual;

A sibling of the individual or the spouse of a sibling;

An individual or the spouse of an individual who is a lineal ancestor or lineal descendant of the individual or the individual's spouse;

An aunt, uncle, great aunt, great uncle, first cousin, niece, nephew, grandniece, or grandnephew, whether related by the whole or the half blood or adoption, or the spouse of any of them; or

Any other individual occupying the residence of the individual; and

(B) With respect to an entity, means:

A person that directly or indirectly controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with, the entity;

An officer of, or an individual performing similar functions with respect to, the entity;

A director of, or an individual performing similar functions with respect to, the entity;

A person that receives or received more than twenty-five thousand dollars from the entity in either the current year or the preceding year or a person that owns more than ten percent of, or an individual who is employed by or is a director of, a person that receives or received more than twenty-five thousand dollars from the entity in either the current year or the preceding year;

An officer or director of, or an individual performing similar functions with respect to, a person described in subsection (2)(B)(i) of this section;

The spouse of, or an individual occupying the residence of, an individual described in subsections (2)(B)(i) to (2)(B)(v) of this section; or

An individual who has the relationship specified in subsection (2)(A)(iv) of this section to an individual or the spouse of an individual described in subsections (2)(B)(i) to (2)(B)(v) of this section.

"Agreement" means an agreement between a provider and an individual for the performance of debt-management services.

"Bank" means a financial institution, including a commercial bank, savings bank, savings and loan association, credit union, mortgage bank, and trust company, engaged in the business of banking, chartered under federal or state law, and regulated by a federal or state banking regulatory authority.

"Business address" means the physical location of a business, including the name and number of a street.

"Concessions" means assent to repayment of a debt on terms more favorable to an individual than the terms of the contract between the individual and a creditor.

"Day" means calendar day.

(A) "Debt-management services" means services as an intermediary between an individual and one or more creditors of the individual for the purpose of obtaining concessions, but does not include:

Legal services provided in an attorney-client relationship by an attorney licensed to practice law in this state;

Accounting services provided in an accountant-client relationship by a certified public accountant certified or authorized by the state board of accountancy to provide accounting services in this state; or

Representative services provided before the internal revenue service, the department of revenue, or the department of labor and employment in an enrolled agent-client relationship for tax purposes by an enrolled agent who is authorized by and in good standing with the United States department of treasury, if the enrolled agent is not engaging in other debt management services.

(B) The exemptions in subsection (8)(A) of this section do not apply to any person who directly or indirectly provides any debt management services on behalf of a licensed attorney, certified public accountant, or enrolled agent if that person is not an employee of the licensed attorney, certified public accountant, or enrolled agent.

"Entity" means a person other than an individual.

"Good faith" means honesty in fact and the observance of reasonable standards of fair dealing.

"Individual" means a natural person.

"Person" means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, or any other legal or commercial entity. The term does not include a public corporation, government, or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality.

"Plan" means a program or strategy in which a provider furnishes debt-management services to an individual and that includes a schedule of payments to be made by or on behalf of the individual and used to pay debts owed by the individual.

"Principal amount of the debt" means the amount of a debt at the time of an agreement.

"Provider" means a person that provides, offers to provide, or agrees to provide debt-management services directly or through others.

"Record" means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

"Settlement fee" means a charge imposed on or paid by an individual in connection with a creditor's assent to accept in full satisfaction of a debt an amount less than the principal amount of the debt.

"Sign" means, with present intent to authenticate or adopt a record:

To execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or

To attach to or logically associate with the record an electronic sound, symbol, or process.

"State" means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

(A) "Trust account" means an account held by a provider that is:

Established in an insured bank;

Separate from other accounts of the provider or its designee;

Designated as a trust account or other account designated to indicate that the money in the account is not the money of the provider; and

Used to hold money of one or more individuals for disbursement to creditors of the individuals.

(B) For a plan under which creditors will settle debts for less than the principal amount of the debt, nothing in this part 2 prohibits a provider from requesting or requiring an individual to place funds in an account, separate from the individual's then-existing bank account, to be used for the provider's fees and for payments to creditors or debt collectors in connection with the debt management services, if:

The funds are held in an account at an insured financial institution;

The individual owns the funds held in the account and is paid accrued interest on the account, if any;

The entity administering the account is not owned, controlled by, or in any way affiliated with the provider;

The entity administering the account does not give or accept any money or other compensation in exchange for referrals of business involving the debt management provider or plan; and

The individual may withdraw from the debt management plan at any time without penalty, and immediately receives all funds in the account, other than fees earned in compliance with section 5-19-223, as required by section 5-19-226.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1137, § 4, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.5-202 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-19-203. Exempt agreements and persons.

This part 2 does not apply to an agreement with an individual who the provider has no reason to know resides in this state at the time of the agreement.

This part 2 does not apply to a provider to the extent that the provider:

Provides or agrees to provide debt-management, educational, or counseling services to an individual who the provider has no reason to know resides in this state at the time the provider agrees to provide the services;

Receives no compensation for debt-management services from or on behalf of the individuals to whom it provides the services or from their creditors;

Provides debt-management services only to persons that have incurred debt in the conduct of business; or

Is subject to the "Colorado Foreclosure Protection Act", part 11 of article 1 of title 6.

This part 2 does not apply to the following persons or their employees when the person or the employee is engaged in the regular course of the person's business or profession:

(1) A judicial officer, a person acting under an order of a court or an administrative agency, or an assignee for the benefit of creditors;

(2) A bank;

(3) An affiliate, as defined in section 5-19-202 (2)(B)(i), of a bank if the affiliate is regulated by a federal or state banking regulatory authority; or

(4) A title insurer, escrow company, or other person that provides bill-paying services if the provision of debt-management services is incidental to the bill-paying services.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1140, § 4, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.5-203 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-19-204. Registration required.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, on or after July 1, 2008, a provider may not provide debt-management services to an individual who it reasonably should know resides in this state at the time it agrees to provide the services, unless the provider is registered under this part 2.

If a provider is registered under this part 2, subsection (a) of this section does not apply to an employee or agent of the provider.

The administrator shall maintain and publicize a list of the names of all registered providers.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1141, § 4, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.5-204 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-19-205. Application for registration - form, fee, and accompanying documents.

An application for registration as a provider shall be in a form prescribed by the administrator.

An application for registration as a provider shall be accompanied by:

The fee established by the administrator. The administrator shall transmit the fee to the state treasurer, who shall deposit it in the uniform consumer credit code cash fund, created in section 5-6-204 (1).

The bond required by section 5-19-213;

Identification of all trust accounts required by section 5-19-222 and an irrevocable consent authorizing the administrator to review and examine the trust accounts;

Proof of compliance with the requirements of title 7 that specify the prerequisites for an entity to do business in this state; and

If the applicant is organized as a not-for-profit entity or is exempt from taxation, evidence of not-for-profit and tax-exempt status applicable to the applicant under the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", 26 U.S.C. sec. 501, as amended.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1141, § 4, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.5-205 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-19-206. Application for registration - required information.

An application for registration shall be signed under penalty of false statement and include:

The applicant's name, principal business address and telephone number, and all other business addresses in this state, electronic-mail addresses, and internet website addresses;

All names under which the applicant conducts business;

The address of each location in this state at which the applicant will provide debt-management services or a statement that the applicant will have no such location;

The name and home address of each officer and director of the applicant and each person that owns at least ten percent of the applicant;

Identification of every jurisdiction in which, during the five years immediately preceding the application:

The applicant or any of its officers or directors has been licensed or registered to provide debt-management services; or

Individuals have resided when they received debt-management services from the applicant;

A statement describing, to the extent it is known or should be known by the applicant, any material civil or criminal judgment or litigation and any material administrative or enforcement action by a governmental agency in any jurisdiction against the applicant, any of its officers, directors, owners, or agents, or any person who is authorized to initiate transactions to the trust account required by section 5-19-222;

The applicant's financial statements, audited by an accountant licensed to conduct audits, for each of the two years immediately preceding the application or, if it has not been in operation for the two years preceding the application, for the period of its existence;

A description of the three most commonly used educational programs that the applicant provides or intends to provide to individuals who reside in this state and a copy of any materials used or to be used in those programs;

A description of the applicant's financial analysis and initial plan, including any form or electronic model, used to evaluate the financial condition of individuals. The description shall be deemed to be confidential commercial data under section 24-72-204 (3)(a)(IV).

A copy of each form of agreement that the applicant will use with individuals who reside in this state;

The schedule of fees and charges that the applicant will use with individuals who reside in this state;

At the applicant's expense, the results of a state and national fingerprint-based criminal history record check, conducted within the immediately preceding twelve months, covering every officer of the applicant and every employee of the applicant who is authorized to initiate transactions to the trust account required by section 5-19-222. The administrator shall be the authorized agency to receive information regarding the result of the national criminal history record check. If a provider delegates to an independent contractor or subcontractor the authority to initiate transactions to the trust account required by section 5-19-222, the administrator is entitled to receive the results of the state and national fingerprint-based criminal history record check only for those independent contractors or subcontractors who are authorized to initiate trust account transactions pursuant to that delegated authority.

The names and addresses of all employers of each director during the five years immediately preceding the application; except that if a director receives no compensation from the provider, the applicable period shall be two years. The names and addresses shall be deemed to be confidential.

A description of any ownership interest of at least ten percent by a director, owner, or employee of the applicant in:

(A) Any affiliate of the applicant; or

(B) Any entity that provides products or services to the applicant or any individual relating to the applicant's debt-management services;

For not-for-profit providers, a statement of the amount of compensation of the applicant's five most highly compensated employees for each of the three years immediately preceding the application or, if it has not been in operation for the three years immediately preceding the application, for the period of its existence;

The identity of each director who is an affiliate, as defined in section 5-19-202 (2)(A) or (2)(B)(i), (2)(B)(ii), (2)(B)(iv), (2)(B)(v), (2)(B)(vi), or (2)(B)(vii), of the applicant; and

Any other information that the administrator reasonably requires to perform the administrator's duties under section 5-19-209.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1142, § 4, effective August 9.

L. 2021:

(12) amended, (SB 21-057), ch. 378, p. 2515, § 1, effective June 29.

L. 2022:

(12) amended, (HB 22-1410), ch. 404, p. 2873, § 2, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.5-206 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-19-206.5. Name-based judicial record check.

When the results of a fingerprint-based criminal history record check of an officer of the applicant or employee or agent of the applicant performed pursuant to section 5-19-206 (12) reveal a record of arrest without a disposition, the administrator shall require that person to submit to a name-based judicial record check, as defined in section 22-2-119.3 (6)(d).

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (HB 19-1166), ch. 125, p. 537, § 1, effective April 18.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (HB 22-1270), ch. 114, p. 513, § 2, effective April 21.

5-19-207. Application for registration - obligation to update information.

An applicant or registered provider shall notify the administrator within fifteen days after a change in the information specified in section 5-19-205 (b)(5) or section 5-19-206 (1), (3), (6), (10), or (11).

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1144, § 4, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.5-207 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-19-208. Application for registration - public information.

Except for the information required by section 5-19-206 (7), (9), (12), (13), and (15), and the addresses required by section 5-19-206 (4), the administrator shall make the information in an application for registration as a provider available to the public.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1144, § 4, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.5-208 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-19-209. Certificate of registration - issuance or denial.

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this section, the administrator shall issue a certificate of registration as a provider to a person that complies with sections 5-19-205 and 5-19-206.

The administrator may deny registration if:

The application contains information that is materially erroneous or incomplete;

An officer, director, or owner of the applicant has been convicted of a crime, or suffered a civil judgment, involving dishonesty or the violation of state or federal securities laws;

The applicant or any of its officers, directors, or owners has defaulted in the payment of money collected for others; or

The administrator, upon reasonable belief, finds that the financial responsibility, experience, character, or general fitness of the applicant or its owners, directors, employees, or agents does not warrant belief that the business will be operated in compliance with this part 2.

The administrator shall deny registration if:

(1) The application is not accompanied by the fee established by the administrator; or

(2) With respect to an applicant that is organized as a not-for-profit entity or has obtained tax-exempt status under the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", 26 U.S.C. sec. 501, as amended, the applicant's board of directors is not independent of the applicant's employees and agents.

A board of directors is not independent for purposes of subsection (c) of this section if more than one-fourth of its members:

(1) Are affiliates of the applicant, as defined in section 5-19-202 (2)(A), (2)(B)(i), (2)(B)(ii), (2)(B)(iv), (2)(B)(v), (2)(B)(vi), or (2)(B)(vii); or

(2) After the date ten years before first becoming a director of the applicant, were employed by or directors of a person that received from the applicant more than twenty-five thousand dollars in either the current year or the preceding year.

The administrator may temporarily approve a certificate of registration in the event an applicant has made a timely effort to obtain a criminal records check as required in section 5-19-206 (12), but for which a timely return of information has not occurred, for a reasonable period of time but no longer than one hundred twenty days, provided that the applicant has provided all other required information in the application for registration and the administrator finds no reason to believe from the information that has been provided that the applicant may not provide fair and honest services to debtors under this part 2.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1144, § 4, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.5-209 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-19-210. Certificate of registration - timing.

The administrator shall approve or deny an initial registration as a provider within ninety days after an application is filed. In connection with a request pursuant to section 5-19-206 (17) for additional information, the administrator may extend the ninety-day period for not more than thirty days. Within seven days after denying an application, the administrator, in a record, shall inform the applicant of the reasons for the denial.

If the administrator denies an application for registration as a provider or does not act on an application within the time prescribed in subsection (a) of this section, the applicant may appeal and request a hearing pursuant to article 4 of title 24.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1145, § 4, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.5-210 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-19-211. Renewal of registration.

A provider shall obtain a renewal of its registration annually before the expiration date of the registration to be renewed, as specified in this section.

An application for renewal of registration as a provider shall be in a form prescribed by the administrator, signed under penalty of false statement, and:

Be filed before the registration expires;

Be accompanied by the fee established by the administrator and the bond required by section 5-19-213;

Contain a financial statement, reviewed by an accountant licensed to conduct audits, for the applicant's fiscal year immediately preceding the application; except that the third renewal after initial registration and every fourth renewal thereafter shall be audited rather than reviewed;

Disclose any changes in the information contained in the applicant's application for registration or its immediately previous application for renewal, as applicable;

Disclose the total amount of money received by the applicant pursuant to plans during the preceding twelve months from or on behalf of individuals who reside in this state and the total amount of money distributed to creditors of those individuals during that period;

If the applicant does not hold money on behalf of any debtor, disclose for business done with debtors in the state of Colorado during the preceding twelve months, the number of debtors with whom the applicant has had agreements, the number of fully settled debt agreements with creditors that applicant concluded for debtors, and an estimate of the total amount of debt under contract between applicant and debtors; and

Provide any other information that the administrator reasonably requires to perform the administrator's duties under this section.

Except for the information required by section 5-19-206 (7), (9), (12), (13), and (15) and the addresses required by section 5-19-206 (4), the administrator shall make the information in an application for renewal of registration as a provider available to the public.

If a registered provider files a timely and complete application for renewal of registration, the registration remains effective until the administrator, in a record, notifies the applicant of a denial and states the reasons for the denial.

If the administrator denies an application for renewal of registration as a provider, the applicant, within thirty days after receiving notice of the denial, may appeal and request a hearing pursuant to article 4 of title 24. Subject to section 5-19-234, while the appeal is pending, the applicant shall continue to provide debt-management services to individuals with whom it has agreements. If the denial is affirmed, subject to the administrator's order and section 5-19-234, the applicant shall continue to provide debt-management services to individuals with whom it has agreements until, with the approval of the administrator, it transfers the agreements to another registered provider or returns to the individuals all unexpended money that is under the applicant's control.

If a registered provider fails to file by July 1 a complete application for renewal of registration and the required renewal fee, the registration shall automatically expire on that date.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1145, § 4, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.5-211 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-19-212. Registration in another state.

If a provider holds a license or certificate of registration in another state authorizing it to provide debt-management services, the provider may submit a copy of that license or certificate and the application for it instead of an application in the form prescribed by section 5-19-205 (a), 5-19-206, or 5-19-211 (b). The administrator shall accept the application and the license or certificate from the other state as an application for registration as a provider or for renewal of registration as a provider, as appropriate, in this state if:

The application in the other state contains information substantially similar to, or more comprehensive than, that required in an application submitted in this state;

The applicant provides the information required by section 5-19-206 (1), (3), (8), (10), and (11);

The applicant, under penalty of false statement, certifies that the information contained in the application is current or, to the extent it is not current, supplements the application to make the information current; and

The application is accompanied by the items required in section 5-19-205 (b).

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1146, § 4, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.5-212 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-19-213. Bond required.

Except as otherwise provided in section 5-19-214, a provider that is required to be registered under this part 2 shall file a surety bond with the administrator, which shall:

Be in effect during the period of registration and for two years after the provider ceases providing debt-management services to individuals in this state; and

Run to this state for the benefit of this state and of individuals who reside in this state when they agree to receive debt-management services from the provider, as their interests may appear.

Have payment conditioned upon noncompliance of the provider or its agent with this part 2.

If a final order or judgment is issued under section 5-19-233 (a), to the expenses charged pursuant to section 5-19-232 (b)(1).

A surety bond filed pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall:

(1) Be in the amount of fifty thousand dollars or other larger or smaller amount that the administrator determines is warranted by the financial condition and business experience of the provider, the history of the provider in performing debt-management services, the risk to individuals, and any other factor the administrator considers appropriate;

(2) Be issued by a bonding, surety, or insurance company authorized to do business in this state and rated at least A by a nationally recognized rating organization; and

If the principal amount of a surety bond is reduced by payment of a claim or a judgment, the provider and the surety shall notify the administrator immediately and, within thirty days after notice by the administrator, the provider shall file a new or additional surety bond in an amount set by the administrator. The amount of the new or additional bond shall be at least the amount of the bond immediately before payment of the claim or judgment. If for any reason a surety terminates a bond, the surety shall provide written notice of the termination to the administrator immediately, and the provider shall immediately file a new surety bond in the amount of fifty thousand dollars or other amount determined pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.

The administrator or an individual may obtain satisfaction out of the surety bond procured pursuant to this section if:

(1) The administrator assesses expenses under section 5-19-232 (b)(1), issues a final order under section 5-19-233 (a)(2), or recovers a final judgment under section 5-19-233 (a)(4), (a)(5), or (d); or

(2) An individual recovers a final judgment pursuant to section 5-19-235 (a), (b), (c)(1), (c)(2), or (c)(4).

If claims against a surety bond exceed or are reasonably expected to exceed the amount of the bond, the administrator, on the initiative of the administrator or on petition of the surety, shall, unless the proceeds are adequate to pay all costs, judgments, and claims, distribute the proceeds in the following order:

(1) To satisfaction of a final order or judgment under section 5-19-233 (a)(2), (a)(4), (a)(5), or (d);

(2) To final judgments recovered by individuals pursuant to section 5-19-235 (a), (b), (c)(1), (c)(2), or (c)(4), pro rata;

(3) To claims of individuals established to the satisfaction of the administrator, pro rata; and

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1147, § 4, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.5-213 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-19-214. Bond required - substitute.

Instead of the surety bond required by section 5-19-213, a provider may deliver to the administrator, in the amount required by section 5-19-213 (b), and, except as otherwise provided in subsection (a)(1) of this section, payable or available to this state and to individuals who reside in this state when they agree to receive debt-management services from the provider, as their interests may appear, if the provider or its agent does not comply with this part 2:

With the approval of the administrator, an irrevocable letter of credit, issued or confirmed by a bank approved by the administrator, payable upon presentation of a certificate by the administrator stating that the provider or its agent has not complied with this part 2.

If a provider furnishes a substitute pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, the provisions of section 5-19-213 (a), (c), (d), and (e) apply to the substitute.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1148, § 4, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.5-214 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-19-215. Good faith requirement.

A provider shall act in good faith in all matters under this part 2.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1149, § 4, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.5-215 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-19-216. Customer service.

A provider required to be registered under this part 2 shall maintain a toll-free communication system, staffed at a level that reasonably permits an individual to speak to a counselor, debt specialist, or customer-service representative, as appropriate, during ordinary business hours.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1149, § 4, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.5-216 as it existed prior to 2017.

5-19-217. Prerequisites for providing debt-management services.

Before providing or contracting to provide debt-management services, a registered provider shall give the individual an itemized list of goods and services and the charges for each. The list shall be clear and conspicuous, be in a record the individual may keep whether or not the individual assents to an agreement, and describe the goods and services the provider offers:

Free of additional charge if the individual enters into an agreement;

For a charge if the individual does not enter into an agreement; and

For a charge if the individual enters into an agreement, using the following terminology, as applicable, and format:

That nonpayment of debt may lead creditors to increase finance and other charges or undertake collection activity, including litigation;

Unless it is not true, that the provider may receive compensation from the creditors of the individual; and

That, unless the individual is insolvent, if a creditor settles for less than the full amount of the debt, the plan may result in the creation of taxable income to the individual, even though the individual does not receive any money.

A provider may not furnish or contract to furnish debt-management services unless the provider, through the services of a counselor or debt specialist:

(1) Provides the individual with reasonable education about the management of personal finance;

(2) Has prepared a financial analysis; and

(3) If the individual is to make regular, periodic payments:

Has prepared a plan for the individual;

Has made a determination, based on the provider's analysis of the information provided by the individual and otherwise available to it, that the plan is suitable for the individual and the individual will be able to meet the payment obligations under the plan; and

Believes that each creditor of the individual listed as a participating creditor in the plan will accept payment of the individual's debts as provided in the plan.

All other creditors.

Before an individual assents to an agreement to engage in a plan, a provider shall:

(1) Provide the individual with a copy of the analysis and plan required by subsection (b) of this section in a record that identifies the provider and that the individual may keep whether or not the individual assents to the agreement;

(2) Inform the individual of the availability, at the individual's option, of assistance by a toll-free communication system or in person to discuss the financial analysis and plan required by subsection (b) of this section; and

(3) With respect to all creditors identified by the individual or otherwise known by the provider to be creditors of the individual, provide the individual with a list of:

(A) Creditors that the provider expects to participate in the plan and grant concessions;

(B) Creditors that the provider expects to participate in the plan but not grant concessions;

(C) Creditors that the provider expects not to participate in the plan; and

Before an individual assents to an agreement to engage in a plan, the provider shall inform the individual, in a record that contains nothing else, that is given separately, and that the individual may keep whether or not the individual assents to the agreement:

(1) Of the name and business address of the provider;

(2) That plans are not suitable for all individuals and the individual may ask the provider about other ways, including bankruptcy, to deal with indebtedness;

(3) That establishment of a plan may adversely affect the individual's credit rating or credit scores;

If a provider may receive payments from an individual's creditors and the plan contemplates that the individual's creditors will reduce finance charges or fees for late payment, default, or delinquency, the provider may comply with subsection (d) of this section by providing the following disclosure, surrounded by black lines:

(1) Debt-management plans are not right for all individuals, and you may ask us to provide information about other ways, including bankruptcy, to deal with your debts.

(2) Using a debt-management plan may hurt your credit rating or credit scores.

(3) We may receive compensation for our services from your creditors.

Name and business address of provider

If a provider will not receive payments from an individual's creditors and the plan contemplates that the individual's creditors will reduce finance charges or fees for late payment, default, or delinquency, a provider may comply with subsection (d) of this section by providing the following disclosure, surrounded by black lines:

(1) Debt-management plans are not right for all individuals, and you may ask us to provide information about other ways, including bankruptcy, to deal with your debts.

(2) Using a debt-management plan may hurt your credit rating or credit scores.

Name and business address of provider

If a plan contemplates that creditors will settle debts for less than the full principal amount of debt owed, a provider may comply with subsection (d) of this section by providing the following disclosure, surrounded by black lines:

(1) Our program is not right for all individuals, and you may ask us to provide information about bankruptcy and other ways to deal with your debts.

(2) Nonpayment of your debts under our program may:

Hurt your credit rating or credit scores;

Lead your creditors to increase finance and other charges; and

Lead your creditors to undertake activity, including lawsuits, to collect the debts.

(3) Reduction of debt under our program may result in taxable income to you, even though you will not actually receive any money.

Name and business address of provider

Set-up fee

dollar amount of fee

Monthly service fee

dollar amount of fee or method of determining amount

Settlement fee

dollar amount of fee or method of determining amount

Goods and services in addition to those provided in connection with a plan:

(item) dollar amount or method of determining amount

(item) dollar amount or method of determining amount.

IMPORTANT INFORMATION FOR YOU TO CONSIDER

IMPORTANT INFORMATION FOR YOU TO CONSIDER

IMPORTANT INFORMATION FOR YOU TO CONSIDER

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1149, § 4, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-14.5-217 as it existed prior to 2017.